DI-1128
DIAGNOSTICS - MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATION SYSTEM

DIAX3-01

DTC B1245 | Auto wiper ECU communication stop

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

This DTC is output when communication stops between the Wiper control ECU and the Body ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

No communication from wiper control ECU for more than 10 | » Wiper control ECU
seconds. *Wire harness

B1245

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-1118.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check auto wiper ECU.

CHECK:

Check that the auto wiper system operates normally.

HINT:

With this inspection, whether or not the auto wiper ECU CPU functions normally can be diagnosed.

NG> Replace the auto wiper ECU (See page IN-38
)-
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2 [ Check wire harness. (See page IN-38)

PREPARATION:
Pull out the ECU connectors mentioned below.
Wire harness side connector of ECU Terminal
Wiper control ECU - Body ECU MPX2 (A65-2) - MPX2 (B12-23)
CHECK:
Check continuity of the wire harness between the connectors.
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Wiper Control ECU | | Body ECU (Main)
T 120450
OK:

There is a continuity between the connectors.
HINT:
If there is OPEN in any wire harness, please repair it.

NG> Repair or replace wire harness.

Replace wiper control ECU (See page
IN-38).

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)




